test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kalaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - kalā: # nouns 18 '(eng) fish / (fin) kala' 
    kalā+N+Sg+Nom: kalā
    kalā+N+Sg+Gen: kalā
    kalā+N+Sg+Par: [kaʼllõ, kallõ]
    kalā+N+Pl+Dat: kalān
    kalā+N+Sg+Ins: kalāks
    kalā+N+Sg+Ill: [kaʼllõ, kallõ]
    kalā+N+Sg+Ela: kalāst
    kalā+N+Pl+Nom: kalād
    kalā+N+Pl+Gen: kalād
    kalā+N+Pl+Par: [kaʼļḑi, kaļḑi]
    kalā+N+Pl+Dat: kalādõn
    kalā+N+Pl+Ins: kalādõks
    kalā+N+Pl+Ill: [kaʼļži, kaļži]
    kalā+N+Pl+Ela: [kaʼļšti, kaļšti]
